Illinois, session 104th, HB5360.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Nursing Home Care Act is amended by 5changing Section 1-101 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 45/1-101)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4151-101) 7    Sec. 1-101. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as 8the Nursing Home Care Act.9(Source: P.A. 85-1378.)